Arkansas, session 2025, HB1064.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-5-402 is amended to read as follows:
7-5-402. Voter qualification.
The following persons, if possessing the qualifications of electors,
may cast an absentee ballot in any election:
(1) Any person who will be unavoidably absent from his or her
voting place on the day of the election;
(2) Any person who will be unable to attend the polls on
election day because of illness or physical disability; and
(3) Any person who is prevented from voting due to observance of
a religious discipline or religious holiday during the entire twelve (12)
hours that the polls are open on election day.; and
(4) Any person who is over sixty-five (65) years of age on
election day.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-5-404(b)(2), concerning the requirements
*SSS032*
12/11/2024 11:57:08 AM SSS032

HB1064
of the county clerk to mail an application for an absentee ballot, is amended
to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(E)(i) For a voter who is over sixty-five (65) years of
age on election day, the application shall remain in effect for one (1)
calendar year unless withdrawn by the voter.
(ii) No later than twenty-five (25) days before each
election during the calendar year in which a voter has applied for an
absentee ballot under subdivision (b)(2)(E)(i) of this section, the county
clerk shall mail an absentee ballot for each election.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-5-405(a)(2)(B), concerning the required
statement for a voter requesting an absentee ballot, is amended to read as
follows:
(B) A statement in which the voter must indicate that he
or she is requesting an absentee ballot because he or she will be:
(i) Unavoidably absent from the polling site on
election day;
(ii) Unable to attend the polls on election day
because of illness or physical disability;
(iii) Unable to attend the polls on election day
because of residence in a long-term care or residential facility licensed by
the state; or
(iv) Unable to attend the polls due to observance of
a religious discipline or religious holiday during the entire twelve (12)
hours that the polls are open on election day; or
(v) Over sixty-five (65) years of age on election
day;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 7-5-405(b)(2), concerning persons the
Secretary of State may prescribe separate absentee ballot application forms
for, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) Persons whose application would be valid for one (1)
calendar year.
(B) This includes the following:
(i) Persons who reside outside the county in which
they are registered to vote;
12/11/2024 11:57:08 AM

HB1064
(ii) Persons in long-term care or residential
facilities licensed by the state; and
(iii) Voters with disabilities; and
(iv) Persons who are over sixty-five (65) years of
age on election day; and































12/11/2024 11:57:08 AM